Maryland, session 2025, HB0514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.
(c) “Chiropractor” means an individual who practices chiropractic.
– 1 –

Ch. 21 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) “Direct supervision” means supervision provided by a supervising
chiropractor who is personally present or immediately available where the procedures are
performed to give aid, direction, and instruction when certain procedures or activities are
performed.
[(e) “Extern license” means a license to practice chiropractic under the direct
supervision of a Board–approved licensed chiropractor.]
[(f)] (E) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license
granted by the Board:
(1) To practice chiropractic; or
(2) To practice chiropractic with the right to practice physical therapy.
[(g)] (F) “Licensed chiropractor” means, unless the context requires otherwise,
a chiropractor who is licensed by the Board to practice chiropractic or to practice
chiropractic with the right to practice physical therapy.
[(h)] (G) (1) “Practice chiropractic” means to use a drugless system of health
care based on the principle that interference with the transmission of nerve impulses may
cause disease.
(2) “Practice chiropractic” includes the diagnosing and locating of
misaligned or displaced vertebrae and, through the manual manipulation and adjustment
of the spine and other skeletal structures, treating disorders of the human body.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this title, “practice chiropractic” does
not include the use of drugs or surgery, or the practice of osteopathy, obstetrics, or any
other branch of medicine.
(4) The definition of “practice chiropractic” does not prohibit a chiropractor
from selecting diet and hygiene measures for an individual.
[(i)] (H) “Practice physical therapy” has the meaning stated in § 13–101 of this
article.
(I) “PRECEPTORSHIP” MEANS AN ORGANIZED SYSTEM OF CLINICAL
EXPERIENCE THAT ALLOWS A STUDENT ENROLLED IN A CHIROPRACTIC PROGRAM
OF STUDY TO BE PAIRED WITH A CLINICAL PRECEPTOR FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ATTAINING SPECIFIC LEARNING OBJECTIVES.
3–202.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 21
(a) (1) The Board consists of 7 members.
(2) Of the 7 members:
(i) 5 shall be licensed chiropractors; and
(ii) 2 shall be consumer members.
(3) (i) The Governor shall appoint the chiropractor members, with the
advice of the Secretary, and with the advice and consent of the Senate, from [a]:
1. A list of qualified individuals submitted to the Governor
by the Maryland Chiropractic Association; OR
2. THE INDIVIDUALS WHO PROVIDE A STATEMENT OF
NOMINATION SIGNED BY AT LEAST 15 20 CHIROPRACTORS LICENSED IN THE STATE.
(ii) The number of names on the list SUBMITTED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH shall be [five] THREE times the number of
vacancies.
(iii) The list SUBMITTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH shall include the name of the incumbent member unless the incumbent
declines renomination.
(4) The Governor shall appoint the consumer members with the advice of
the Secretary, and with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) Each chiropractor member of the Board shall be:
(1) A resident of this State;
(2) A licensed chiropractor of integrity and ability who is in active practice;
AND
(3) [A graduate of a resident course in chiropractic; and
(4)] An individual who has practiced chiropractic in this State for at least 5
consecutive years.
3–205.
(a) In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this title, the Board may:
(1) Adopt rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this title;
– 3 –

Ch. 21 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Summon witnesses, administer oaths, take affidavits, and take
testimony about matters that relate to the duties of the Board; [and]
(3) In accordance with the State budget, authorize payment of fees and
travel expenses of witnesses who testify in any proceeding before the Board; AND
(4) EXCEPT FOR AN OFFICE OF A CHIROPRACTOR IN A HOSPITAL,
RELATED INSTITUTION, FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITY, OR FREESTANDING
BIRTHING CENTER, CONDUCT AN UNANNOUNCED INSPECTION OF THE OFFICE OF A
CHIROPRACTOR AGAINST WHOM A COMPLAINT HAS BEEN FILED WITH THE BOARD
REGARDING A VIOLATION OF THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND
PREVENTION’S GUIDELINES ON STANDARD PRECAUTIONS AND RELATED
GUIDELINES IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD TO DETERMINE
COMPLIANCE WITH THE GUIDELINES AT THAT OFFICE.
(b) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this title, the Board shall:
(1) Adopt an official seal;
(2) File reports of its activities as required by the Secretary;
(3) Assist in prosecutions under this title; [and]
(4) Investigate an alleged violation of this title; AND
(5) ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING PRECEPTORSHIPS.
3–301.
(d) This section does not apply to:
(1) A student of chiropractic ENGAGED IN A PRECEPTORSHIP while
under the direct supervision of a BOARD–APPROVED licensed chiropractor engaged in an
educational program[:
(i) Sponsored] SPONSORED by a [college] PROGRAM accredited by
the Council on Chiropractic Education, AN EQUIVALENT ENTITY RECOGNIZED BY THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OR ANOTHER ENTITY THAT ACCREDITS
PROGRAMS OFFERING INSTRUCTION IN CHIROPRACTIC, OR AN EQUIVALENT
FOREIGN AGENCY THAT ACCREDITS PROGRAMS OFFERING INSTRUCTION IN
CHIROPRACTIC; [and
(ii) Approved by the Board;] or
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 21
(2) An individual licensed to practice chiropractic in any other state or a
foreign country while that individual makes a clinical demonstration before:
(i) A chiropractic association;
(ii) A chiropractic convention; or
(iii) A chiropractic [college] PROGRAM.
3–302.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this title, the applicant [shall] MUST:
(1) [(i) Hold a bachelor’s degree from a college or university approved by
an accrediting agency of the United States Department of Education; and
(ii) Have completed satisfactorily college courses required by the
Board; and
(2) (i)] Be a graduate of a [school of] chiropractic PROGRAM OF STUDY
that [has been approved by the Board under § 3–402 of this title] WAS, AT THE TIME OF
THE APPLICANT’S GRADUATION, ACCREDITED BY THE COUNCIL ON CHIROPRACTIC
EDUCATION, AN EQUIVALENT ENTITY RECOGNIZED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION OR ANOTHER ENTITY THAT ACCREDITS PROGRAMS OFFERING
INSTRUCTION IN CHIROPRACTIC, OR AN EQUIVALENT FOREIGN AGENCY THAT
ACCREDITS PROGRAMS OFFERING INSTRUCTION IN CHIROPRACTIC; or
[(ii) 1.] (2) (I) Be licensed in another state for at least 2
years; and
[2.] (II) Be a graduate of a [school of] chiropractic
PROGRAM OF STUDY:
[A.] 1. That has been [approved] ACCREDITED by the
Council on Chiropractic Education, AN EQUIVALENT ENTITY RECOGNIZED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OR ANOTHER ENTITY THAT ACCREDITS PROGRAMS
OFFERING INSTRUCTION IN CHIROPRACTIC, OR AN EQUIVALENT FOREIGN AGENCY
THAT ACCREDITS PROGRAMS OFFERING INSTRUCTION IN CHIROPRACTIC within 4
years after the applicant graduated from that [school] CHIROPRACTIC PROGRAM OF
STUDY; and
[B.] 2. That the Board determines had standards
comparable to an [approved school] ACCREDITED CHIROPRACTIC PROGRAM OF STUDY
at the time the applicant graduated.
– 5 –

Ch. 21 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) An applicant shall be entitled to a license to practice chiropractic with the
right to practice physical therapy if the applicant[:
(1) Satisfies] SATISFIES the requirements [of this section and §§ 3–303
and 3–304(e)(2) of this subtitle;
(2) Was licensed as a chiropractor on or before June 1, 1949; or
(3) Was enrolled at an approved college of chiropractic on June 1, 1949, and
later was graduated by that college and licensed] TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC AND ANY
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD IN REGULATIONS.
[(e) An applicant may not be required under subsection (c)(1)(i) of this section to
hold a bachelor’s degree if the applicant:
(1) Graduated from a school of chiropractic before July 1, 1999; and
(2) Meets the educational requirements in place at the time of the
applicant’s graduation from a school of chiropractic.]
3–303.
(a) To apply for a license, an applicant shall submit to the Board at least 45 days
before an examination:
(1) An application on the form the Board requires that includes
information of the applicant’s:
(i) Educational history;
(ii) Experience in health care;
(iii) [Hours and courses] COURSES taken during chiropractic
studies;
(iv) Training or studies in related fields; and
(v) [Clinical] PRECEPTORSHIP experience;
(2) Certified transcripts that demonstrate compliance with the [college
credit] requirements of § 3–302 of this subtitle;
(3) Proof of any degrees or certification alleged;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 21
(4) Satisfactory evidence of good moral character;
(5) An application fee set by the Board; and
(6) Satisfactory evidence of having completed a State and national criminal
history records check in accordance with § 3–302.1 of this subtitle.
3–304.
(c) The Board shall[:
(1) Notify] NOTIFY each qualified applicant of the time and place of
examination[; and
(2) Publish in a newspaper of general circulation the time and place of each
examination, at least 30 days before the examination].
[(d) (1) The Board shall develop written evaluation criteria to be used to
identify minimum competency on the oral or clinical portions of the examination.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Board shall determine
the subjects, scope, method, and form for examinations given under this title.
(3) Until the grading of all examinations is completed:
(i) The examination papers of each applicant shall be identified only
by a number; and
(ii) The name of the applicant to whom an examination paper
belongs may not be disclosed to any member of the Board.
(4) The examination shall include a written practical or oral section on
clinical subjects, including:
(i) Chiropractic principles;
(ii) Chiropractic technique and practice;
(iii) Hygiene;
(iv) Neurology;
(v) Orthopedics;
(vi) Physical diagnosis;
– 7 –

Ch. 21 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vii) Roentgenology;
(viii) Symptomatology; and
(ix) Physical therapy, as defined in § 13–101 of this article.
(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an applicant qualifies for a
license to practice chiropractic only if the applicant answers correctly at least:
(i) 60 percent of the questions in each subsection of the examination
other than the subsection on physical therapy; and
(ii) 75 percent of all of the questions on the examination other than
those on physical therapy.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an applicant qualifies for a
license to practice chiropractic with the right to practice physical therapy only if the
applicant answers correctly at least:
(i) 60 percent of the questions in each subsection of the examination;
and
(ii) 75 percent of all of the questions on the examination.]
(D) (1) THE BOARD–ADMINISTERED EXAMINATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE GENERAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF THE STATE ON
THE PRACTICE OF CHIROPRACTIC; AND
(II) THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS ON INFECTION CONTROL.
(2) AN APPLICANT QUALIFIES FOR A LICENSE TO PRACTICE
CHIROPRACTIC ONLY IF THE APPLICANT ANSWERS CORRECTLY AT LEAST 75% OF
ALL THE QUESTIONS ON THE BOARD–ADMINISTERED EXAMINATION.
(E) (1) AN APPLICANT SHALL PAY TO THE BOARD AN EXAMINATION FEE
SET BY THE BOARD.
(2) THE PAYMENT OF ONE EXAMINATION FEE ENTITLES AN
APPLICANT TO TAKE THE BOARD–ADMINISTERED EXAMINATION TWICE.
(F) IF AN APPLICANT FAILS THE BOARD–ADMINISTERED EXAMINATION
TWICE, THE APPLICANT MAY RETAKE THE EXAMINATION IF THE APPLICANT PAYS
THE APPROPRIATE FEE.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 21
(G) IN ADDITION TO THE WRITTEN EXAMINATION ADMINISTERED BY THE
BOARD, AN APPLICANT SHALL TAKE AND PASS ALL APPLICABLE SECTIONS OF THE
NATIONAL EXAMINATION ADMINISTERED BY:
(1) THE NATIONAL BOARD OF CHIROPRACTIC EXAMINERS OR ITS
SUCCESSOR ENTITY;
(2) AN EQUIVALENT NATIONAL CHIROPRACTIC TESTING ENTITY
APPROVED BY THE BOARD; OR
(2) (3) AN EQUIVALENT FOREIGN CHIROPRACTIC TESTING ENTITY
APPROVED BY THE BOARD.
3–305.1.
(a) The Board may grant[, as appropriate, an extern] A TEMPORARY license to
an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) To qualify for [an extern] A TEMPORARY license, an applicant [shall be an
individual seeking to participate in a chiropractic externship who] SHALL:
(1) [Submits] SUBMIT an application provided by the Board;
(2) [Has] HAVE graduated from an accredited chiropractic [college]
PROGRAM OF STUDY;
(3) [Has] HAVE begun the process of applying to the Board for a license to
practice chiropractic, but [who has] not met [certain] requirements[, specified in
regulation,] to qualify for a license;
(4) (I) [Has taken and passed the examination of the National Board of
Chiropractic Examiners;] HAVE BEEN LICENSED IN ANOTHER STATE FOR AT LEAST 2
YEARS PRECEDING THE APPLICATION IN THE STATE; OR
(II) HAVE GRADUATED FROM AN ACCREDITED CHIROPRACTIC
PROGRAM OF STUDY WITHIN 6 MONTHS PRECEDING THE APPLICATION IN THE
STATE;
(5) HAVE SUBMITTED WRITTEN, VERIFIED EVIDENCE THAT THE
APPLICANT HAS SUBMITTED A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
– 9 –

Ch. 21 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) [Agrees] AGREE to practice under the direct supervision of a
Board–approved supervisor who is a licensed chiropractor while the [extern] TEMPORARY
license is in effect; and
[(6)] (7) [Pays] PAY the TEMPORARY license fee set by the Board.
(c) The applicant shall be of good moral character.
[(d) (1) The term of an extern license is the lesser of:
(i) The duration of the individual’s participation in the chiropractic
externship; or
(ii) 6 months from the date of the Board’s approval of the externship
application.
(2) The term of an extern license shall terminate on the earlier of:
(i) The date the individual’s chiropractic externship terminates; or
(ii) The date the individual is licensed by the Board to practice
chiropractic without the direct supervision of a Board–approved licensed chiropractor.]
(D) (1) UNLESS THE BOARD SUSPENDS OR REVOKES A TEMPORARY
LICENSE, EACH TEMPORARY LICENSE EXPIRES 6 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE OF
ISSUE.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
TEMPORARY LICENSE MAY BE EXTENDED EVERY 90 DAYS.
(II) THE TOTAL LENGTH OF RENEWAL MAY NOT EXCEED 12
MONTHS FROM THE DATE THE ORIGINAL TEMPORARY LICENSE WAS ISSUED.
3–311.
(a) The Board shall place a licensee on inactive status, if the licensee submits to
the Board:
(1) An application for inactive status on the form required by the Board;
and
(2) The inactive status fee set by the Board.
(b) A licensee on inactive status may reactivate the license [at any time] if the
licensee:
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 21
(1) Complies with the continuing education AND CARDIOPULMONARY
RESUSCITATION (CPR) requirements in effect for the renewal period in which the
licensee seeks to reactivate the license; and
(2) Pays the [reinstatement] REACTIVATION fee set by the Board.
3–313.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 3–315 of this subtitle, the Board may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, with or
without conditions, or suspend or revoke a license, or any combination thereof, if the
applicant or licensee:
(29) Fails to submit to a criminal history records check in accordance with §
3–302.1 of this subtitle; [or]
(30) Fails to comply with any Board order;
(31) DOES AN ACT THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY
ACCEPTED PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS IN THE PRACTICE OF CHIROPRACTIC;
(32) FAILS TO COOPERATE WITH A LAWFUL INVESTIGATION
CONDUCTED BY THE BOARD; OR
(33) EXCEPT IN AN EMERGENCY LIFE–THREATENING SITUATION
WHERE IT IS NOT FEASIBLE OR PRACTICABLE, FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE CENTERS
FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION’S GUIDELINES ON STANDARD
PRECAUTIONS.
3–314.
(a) If after a hearing under § 3–315 of this subtitle the Board finds that there are
grounds under § 3–313 of this subtitle to REPRIMAND ANY LICENSEE, PLACE ANY
LICENSEE ON PROBATION, OR suspend or revoke a license, the Board may impose a
penalty not exceeding $5,000 for each violation:
(1) Instead of REPRIMANDING THE LICENSEE, PLACING THE LICENSEE
ON PROBATION, OR suspending OR REVOKING the license; or
(2) In addition to REPRIMANDING THE LICENSEE, PLACING THE
LICENSEE ON PROBATION, OR suspending or revoking the license.
3–318.
– 11 –

Ch. 21 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) IF THE BOARD, WHILE REVIEWING AN APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE OR
INVESTIGATING AN ALLEGATION BROUGHT AGAINST A LICENSEE UNDER THIS TITLE,
HAS REASON TO BELIEVE AND OBJECTIVE EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT OR
LICENSEE MAY CAUSE HARM TO INDIVIDUALS AFFECTED BY THE APPLICANT’S OR
LICENSEE’S PRACTICE OF CHIROPRACTIC, THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE THE
APPLICANT OR LICENSEE TO SUBMIT TO AN APPROPRIATE EXAMINATION BY A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER DESIGNATED BY THE BOARD.
(B) IN RETURN FOR THE PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC IN THE
STATE, THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE IS DEEMED TO HAVE:
(1) CONSENTED TO SUBMIT TO AN EXAMINATION UNDER THIS
SECTION, IF REQUESTED BY THE BOARD IN WRITING; AND
(2) WAIVED ANY CLAIM OF PRIVILEGE AS TO THE TESTIMONY OR
EXAMINATION REPORTS OF THE EXAMINING HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL.
(C) THE FAILURE OR REFUSAL OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE TO SUBMIT
TO AN EXAMINATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS PRIMA
FACIE EVIDENCE OF THE APPLICANT’S OR LICENSEE’S INABILITY TO PRACTICE
CHIROPRACTIC COMPETENTLY UNLESS THE BOARD FINDS THAT THE FAILURE OR
REFUSAL WAS BEYOND THE CONTROL OF THE LICENSEE.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL PAY THE COST OF ANY EXAMINATION MADE UNDER
THIS SECTION.
[3–402.
(a) The Board shall approve those schools of chiropractic that provide a
curriculum, teaching standards, and facilities that the Board determines are adequate to
prepare a license applicant to practice chiropractic under this title.
(b) To be approved under this section, a school shall offer a program that:
(1) Is 4 academic years that total at least 4,000 60–minute hours of
resident study; and
(2) Leads to a degree of Doctor of Chiropractic.
(c) The Board may inspect any school of chiropractic to determine whether it
meets the standards required by this section.
(d) The Board may approve a school in another state on the recommendation of:
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 21
(1) The chiropractic licensing authority of that state; or
(2) The Council on Chiropractic Education.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 13 –